test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-u-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: тотмагум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: тотмагын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: тотмаге
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [тотмагаме̄н, тотмагагме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [тотмагы̄н, тотмагагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [тотмагы̄г, тотмагагы̄г]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [тотмагув, тотмвгӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [тотмагы̄н, тотмагагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [тотмагагыл, тотмагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: [тотманум, тотмананум]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: [тотман, тотма̄нын]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: [тотма̄нэ, тотмана̄нэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [тотманаме̄н, тотмананме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [тотманн, тотманы̄н, тотмананы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [тотманэ̄н, тотмананэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [тотманув, тотманӯв, тотмананув, тотмананӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [тотманы̄н, тотмананы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [тотма̄ныл, тотмана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger: тотым
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: тотымам
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: тотыман
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: тотыма
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: тотымаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: тотыман
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: тотнсымаг
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: тотымав
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: тотыман
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: тотымат

#Privative
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger: тоттал
